Ohio, session 136, SB95.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5534.428 of the Revised Code be 5
enacted to read as follows: 6
Sec. 5534.428. In addition to any other name prescribed i n 7
the Revised Code or otherwise, the northbound and southbound 8
lanes of interstate route number seventy-one between interstate 9
route number six hundred seventy and east Hudson street, in the 10
municipal corporation of Columbus, shall be known as the "Chief 11
of Police James G. Jackson Memorial Highway." 12
The director of transportation may erect suitable markers 13
along the highway indicating its name. 14